Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1504.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Vulnerable highway user." Any of the following individuals 12345678910111213141516171819202122 who are lawfully on a highway:(1) A pedestrian, excluding a personal delivery device.(2) An individual on a pedalcycle.(3) An individual on a motorized pedalcycle.(4) An individual on an animal.(5) An individual on an animal-drawn vehicle.(6) An individual on an electric personal assistive mobility device.(7) An individual on a nonmotorized self-propelled transportation device.(8) An individual on a motor-driven cycle.* * *Section 2. Section 1532(a) and (b)(1) of Title 75, amended October 16, 2024 (P.L.992, No.103), are amended to read:§ 1532. Suspension of operating privilege.(a) One-year suspension.--The department shall suspend the operating privilege of any driver for one year upon receiving a certified record of the driver's conviction of or an adjudication of delinquency based on any of the following offenses:(1) Any felony in the commission of which a court determines that a vehicle was essentially involved.(3) Any violation of the following provisions:Section 3714(b.1) (relating to careless driving).Section 3735.1 (relating to aggravated assault by vehicle while driving under the influence).Section 3742 (relating to accidents involving death or personal injury).Section 3742.1 (relating to accidents involving death or personal injury while not properly licensed).20250HB1504PN1759 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7111 (relating to dealing in titles and plates for stolen vehicles).Section 7121 (relating to false application for certificate of title or registration).Section 7122 (relating to altered, forged or counterfeit documents and plates).* * *(b) Suspension.--(1) The department shall suspend the operating privilege of any driver for six months upon receiving a certified record of the driver's conviction of or an adjudication of delinquency based on any offense under the following provisions:Section 3367 (relating to racing on highways and trafficways).Section 3714(b) [(relating to careless driving)] or (c.1).Section 3734 (relating to driving without lights to avoid identification or arrest).Section 3736 (relating to reckless driving).Section 3743 (relating to accidents involving damage to attended vehicle or property).* * *Section 3. Section 3303(a)(3) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 3303. Overtaking vehicle on the left.(a) General rule.--The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to the limitations, exceptions and special rules stated in this chapter:20250HB1504PN1759 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(3) The driver of a motor vehicle overtaking a [pedalcycle] vulnerable highway user, other than a pedestrian, proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left of the [pedalcycle] vulnerable highway user within not less than four feet at a careful and prudent reduced speed.* * *Section 4. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3303.1. Vehicles passing pedestrians on a highway.(a) Passing pedestrians.--The following rules shall govern the passing of pedestrians on a highway when vehicles are proceeding in the same or opposite direction:(1) If a pedestrian is walking on a highway or on a shoulder adjacent to a highway, the driver of a motor vehicle shall safely pass a pedestrian on the pedestrian's left side within not less than four feet, except that the driver shall not be required to exit the laned roadway or yield to the pedestrian to achieve the four-foot requirement.(2) If a pedestrian is walking on a highway or on a shoulder adjacent to a highway and the only option for the driver of a motor vehicle to safely pass a pedestrian is on the right side of the pedestrian, the driver of a motor vehicle shall safely pass on the pedestrian's right side within not less than four feet, except that the driver shall not be required to exit the laned roadway or yield to the pedestrian to achieve the four-foot requirement.(b) Construction.--Nothing within this section shall be construed to relieve a pedestrian of the requirements of section 3542 (relating to right-of-way of pedestrians in crosswalks), 20250HB1504PN1759 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 3543 (relating to pedestrians crossing at other than crosswalks) or 3544 (relating to pedestrians walking along or on highway).Section 5. Sections 3502 and 3714 of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 3502. Penalty for violation of subchapter.Any person violating any provision of this subchapter is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of [$10] $25.§ 3714. Careless driving.(a) General rule.--Any person who drives a vehicle in careless disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of careless driving, a summary offense.(b) Unintentional death.--[If] Except as provided in subsection (b.1), if the person who violates this section unintentionally causes the death of another person as a result of the violation, the person shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $500.(b.1) Unintentional death involving a vulnerable highway user.--If the person who violates this section unintentionally causes the death of a vulnerable highway user as a result of the violation, the person shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $500 and not more than $5,000.(c) Serious bodily injury.--[If] Except as provided in subsection (c.1), if the person who violates this section unintentionally causes the serious bodily injury of another person as a result of the violation, the person shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $250.(c.1) Serious bodily injury to a vulnerable highway user.--If the person who violates this section unintentionally causes serious bodily injury to a vulnerable highway user as a result 20250HB1504PN1759 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the violation, the person shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $250 and not more than $2,500.(c.2) Bodily injury to a vulnerable highway user.--If the person who violates this section unintentionally causes bodily injury to a vulnerable highway user as a result of the violation, the person shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $500.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1504PN1759 - 6 - 123456789